New Jersey, session 221, S3599.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 5 of P.L.2013, c.209 (C.18A:40-41i) is amended to read as follows: 5.    a.  A person who coaches a school district or nonpublic school athletic activity shall hold a current certification in [cardio-pulmonary] cardiopulmonary resuscitation from the American Red Cross, American Heart Association, [or] other training program recognized by the Department of Health , or the program established by the Department of Education pursuant to subsection b. of this section. b.    The Department of Education, in consultation with the Department of Health, shall establish a program for coaches of school districts and nonpublic school athletic activities to obtain certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation.  The program shall: (1)   utilize the current national evidence-based guidelines for cardiopulmonary resuscitation; (2)   be modeled on an instructional program established by the American Red Cross, American Heart Association, or other training program recognized by the Department of Health; (3) include a hands-on learning component for each participating coach; and (4)   be provided at no cost to each participating coach. c.     Any costs of implementing the program established pursuant to subsection b. of this section shall be borne by the State. (P.L.2013, c.209, s.5) 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month next following the date of enactment, except that the Department of Education may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.